Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Article 7. Mississippi Small Business Financing Act.

§ 57-10-201.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Business Financing Act”.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved June 30, 1990).

§ 57-10-203.
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and determines that there exists in the state a need to assist business in the state in obtaining financing for new business or in the expansion of existing business in order to promote and develop industrial development and to further the long-term economic development of the state through the improvement of its tax base and the promotion of employment. The Legislature finds and determines that it is necessary to provide financial assistance to business in the state by providing loans, guarantees, insurance and other assistance to business, thereby encouraging the investment of private capital in business in the state. To assist in such matters is essential to the industrial development of the state. In making these determinations, the Legislature has considered and affirmatively expresses its policy to assist businesses, acknowledging that this determination has and will affect competition.

It is hereby further declared that all of the foregoing are public purposes and will serve a public purpose in that they will promote industry, develop trade and increase employment opportunities for the benefit of the inhabitants of the state, either through the increase of commerce or through the promotion of safety, health, welfare, convenience or prosperity; and that the necessity of enacting the provisions herein set forth is in the public interest and is hereby so declared as a matter of express legislative determination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 2; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved June 30, 1990).

§ 57-10-205.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bonds” shall mean any bonds, refunding bonds, notes, debentures, interim certificates or any bond, grant, revenue anticipation notes or any other evidences of indebtedness of the company, whether in temporary or definitive form and whether or not exempt from federal taxation.

“Company” shall mean the Mississippi Business Finance Corporation, formerly the Certified Development Company of Mississippi, Inc., created in Section 57-10-167, Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Cost,” as applied to the eligible business, shall mean and shall include, without limitation because of enumeration, the cost of construction; the cost of acquisition of all lands, structures, rights-of-way, franchises, easements and other property rights and interests; the cost of demolishing, removing, rehabilitating or relocating any buildings or structures on lands acquired, including the cost of acquiring any such lands to which such buildings or structures may be moved, rehabilitated or relocated; the cost of all labor, materials, machinery and equipment, financing charges, letter of credit or other credit enhancement fees, insurance premiums, interest on all bonds prior to and during construction or acquisition and for a period not exceeding one (1) year after completion of such construction or acquisition; cost of engineering, financial and legal services, plans, specifications, studies, surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, commissions, guaranty fees, other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicality of constructing, financing or operating a project of an eligible business; administrative expenses, provisions for working capital, reserves for interest and for extensions, enlargements, additions, improvements and replacements, and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the construction or acquisition of a project of an eligible business or the financing of such construction, acquisition or expansion and the placing of a project of an eligible business in operation. Any obligation or expense incurred by the state or any agency thereof, with the approval of the company, for studies, surveys, borings, preparation of plans and specifications or other work or materials in connection with the construction or acquisition of a project of an eligible business may be regarded as a part of the cost of a project of an eligible business and may be reimbursed to the state or any agency thereof out of the proceeds of the bonds issued therefor. The construction of railroad spur tracks shall be a cost of an eligible business for which financial assistance is available under this article; and such assistance may be provided to an existing eligible business whether or not the construction of such spur tracks is related to an expansion of such eligible business.

“Eligible business” shall mean any person engaged in one or more business enterprises in the state who meets requirements the company shall determine from time to time if the company finds and determines such person is in need of its assistance.

“Indenture” shall mean any trust agreement, deed of trust, mortgage or other security agreement under which bonds authorized pursuant to this article shall be issued or secured.

“Lender” shall mean any federally or state chartered bank, federal land bank, production credit association, bank for cooperatives, state or federally chartered savings and loan association, building and loan association, small business investment company or any other financial institution qualified within the state to originate and service loans, including but not limited to insurance companies, credit unions, investment banking or brokerage companies and mortgage loan companies.

“Loan” shall mean any lease, loan agreement or sales contract as hereinafter defined:

“Lease” shall mean any lease containing an option to purchase the project or projects of the eligible business being financed for a nominal sum upon payment in full, or provision thereof, of all bonds issued in connection with the eligible business and all interest thereon and principal of and premium, if any, thereon and all other expenses in connection therewith.

“Loan agreement” shall mean an agreement providing for a loan of proceeds from the sale and issuance of bonds by the company or by a lender with which the company has contracted to loan such proceeds to one or more contracting parties to be used to pay the cost of one or more projects of an eligible business and providing for the repayment of such loan including but not limited to all interest thereon, and principal of and premium, if any, thereon and all other expenses in connection therewith, by such contracting party or parties and which may provide for such loans to be secured or evidenced by one or more notes, debentures, bonds or other secured or unsecured debt obligations of such contracting party or parties, delivered to the company or to a trustee under an indenture pursuant to which the bonds were issued.

“Sales contract” shall mean a contract providing for the sale of one or more projects of an eligible business to one or more contracting parties and includes but is not limited to a contract providing for payment of the purchase price, including but not limited to all interest thereon, and principal of and premium, if any, thereon and all other expenses in connection therewith, in one or more installments. If the sales contract permits title to a project being sold to an eligible business to pass to such contracting party or parties prior to payment in full of the entire purchase price, it also shall provide for such contracting party or parties to deliver to the company, or to the trustee under the indenture pursuant to which the bonds were issued, one or more notes, debentures, bonds or other secured or unsecured debt obligations of such contracting party or parties providing for timely payments of the purchase price thereof.

“Municipality” shall mean any county or incorporated municipality in the state.

“Person” shall mean a natural person, partnership, association, corporation, business trust or other business entity.

“Revenue Code” shall mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

“Revenues” shall mean any and all fees, rates, rentals, profits and receipts collected by, payable to, or otherwise derived by, the company, and all other moneys and income of whatsoever kind or character collected by, payable to, or otherwise derived by, the company in connection with loans to any eligible business in furtherance of the purposes of this article.

“Business enterprise” shall mean (a) any industry for the manufacturing, processing, assembling, storing, warehousing, servicing, distributing or selling of any products of agriculture, mining or industry or professional services; (b) any commercial enterprise; (c) enterprises for research and development, including but not limited to scientific laboratories; (d) any conference center, or any final destination or resort hotel having a minimum of one hundred fifty (150) rooms, or any combination of the foregoing; (e) any theme park or movie industry production studio, or any combination thereof, which would employ a minimum of two hundred (200) net full-time employees; or (f) such other businesses as will be in furtherance of the public purposes of this article as determined by the company.

“State” shall mean the State of Mississippi.

“Umbrella bonds” shall mean the bonds issued pursuant to Section 57-10-213 of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 3; Laws, 1986, ch. 355; Laws, 1987, ch. 464, § 1; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 7; Laws, 1991, ch. 358 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).

§ 57-10-207.
General powers of board of directors.

In addition to those powers granted elsewhere by law, the board of directors of the company is hereby granted all powers necessary or appropriate to carry out and effectuate the purposes of this article, including, but not limited to, the following powers to:

Borrow money and issue bonds as provided by this article;

Procure insurance or guarantees from any public or private entities, including any department, agency or instrumentality of the United States of America, or, subject to the provisions of and to the extent moneys are available in the fund created by Section 57-10-215, insure or guarantee the payment of any bonds issued by the company, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance or guarantees or other instruments of indebtedness;

Receive and accept from any source aid or contributions of money, property, labor or other things of value to be held, used and applied to carry out the purposes of this article (subject, however, to any conditions upon which grants or contributions are made) including, but not limited to gifts or grants from any department, agency or instrumentality of the United States of America;

Enter into agreements with any department, agency or instrumentality of the United States of America or of the state and with lenders and enter into loans with contracting parties for the purpose of planning, regulating and providing for the financing or assisting in the financing of any eligible business or any project thereof;

Enter into contracts or agreements with lenders for the servicing and/or processing of loans;

Provide technical assistance to local industrial development authorities and to profit and nonprofit entities in the development or operation by, or assistance to, persons engaged in business enterprises and distribute data and information concerning the encouragement and improvement of business enterprises in the state;

To the extent permitted in the proceedings pursuant to which the bonds of the company are issued, consent to any modification with respect to the rate of interest, time for, and payment of, any installment of principal or interest, or any other term of any contract, loan, sales contract, lease, indenture or agreement of any kind to which the company is a party;

To the extent permitted in the proceedings pursuant to which the bonds of the company are issued, enter into contracts with any lender containing provisions authorizing the lender to reduce the charges or fees, exclusive of loan payments, to persons unable to pay the regular schedule thereof when, by reason of other income or payment by any department, agency or instrumentality of the United States of America or the state, the reduction can be made without jeopardizing the economic stability of the eligible business being financed;

Allocate any of its property to the insurance or guaranty fund established by Section 57-10-215 or to any other fund of the company, such property consisting of:

Moneys appropriated by the state;

Premiums, fees and any other amounts received by the company with respect to financial assistance provided by the company;

Proceeds as designated by the company from the loan or other disposition of property held or acquired by the company;

Income from investments that were made by the company or on the behalf of the company from moneys in one or more of its funds; or

Any other moneys made available to the company consistent with this article;

Use any fund or funds of the company for any and all expenses to be paid by the company including, by way of example, but not by limitation: (i) any and all expenses for employment of administrative and clerical staff, legal, actuarial and other services; (ii) all costs, charges, fees and expenses of the company relating to the authorizing, preparing, printing, selling, issuing and insuring of bonds and the funding of reserves; and (iii) all expenses and costs relating to the guaranteeing, insuring or procurement of guarantees, insurance or other instruments providing credit or the enhancement of credit for the bonds;

Collect fees and charges, as the company determines to be reasonable, in connection with its loans, insurance, guarantees, commitments and servicing thereof;

Sell, at public or private sale, with or without public bidding, any obligation held by the company under this article;

Invest any funds not needed for immediate disbursement, including any funds held in reserve, in any obligations or securities which may be legally purchased by political subdivisions in the state or as may be otherwise permitted by Section 57-10-251; and

Take any action necessary or convenient for the exercise of the powers granted by this article or reasonably implied from them.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 4; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 8; Laws, 2001, ch. 337, § 33, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 6, 2001.).

§ 57-10-209.
Issuance and refunding of bonds; methods for financing projects.

Upon receipt of a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Economic and Community Development, the company shall have the power to borrow money and to issue from time to time its bonds to pay the cost of the projects for which such bonds have been issued, including but not limited to the power to issue from time to time bonds to renew or to pay bonds, including the interest thereon. Whenever bonds can be refunded to obtain interest rates on refunding bonds which are lower than the interest rates on the bonds to be refunded it shall have the power to refund any bonds by the issuance of new bonds, whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, and to issue bonds partly to refund outstanding bonds. Refunding bonds may be sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption or payment of the bonds to be refunded, or exchanged for the bonds to be refunded. The company may undertake the financing of the cost of a project for an eligible business from the proceeds of its bonds by one or more of the following methods: (a) entering into a lease for the facilities of the eligible business being financed; (b) selling such facilities to the eligible business under a sales contract; (c) lending the proceeds of the sale of the bonds under a loan agreement with the eligible business; (d) entering into a loan to lenders transaction in the manner described in Section 57-10-227; or (e) entering into such other transaction or transactions as the company deems appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 51; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved June 30, 1990).

§ 57-10-211.
Participation with lenders in making or purchasing loans.

In addition to and not as a limitation upon the powers to issue bonds as elsewhere expressed in this article, the company may, with proceeds of an issue of its bonds, participate with lenders in making or purchasing loans to eligible businesses to be serviced by such lenders, provided that:

The share of the company shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of the total principal amount of any such loan, and such participation shall be payable with interest at the same times, but not necessarily at the same interest rate, as the share of the lender, and both shares shall be equally and ratably secured by a valid mortgage on, or security interest in, real or personal property or by any other security satisfactory to the company to secure payment of the loan; however, the company’s share of any such loan may equal one hundred percent (100%) of the total principal amount of the business loan if the lender participating in the making or purchasing of such business loan by servicing the loan, purchased one hundred percent (100%) of the total amount of the bonds issued by the company in connection with or allocable to such business loan;

The total principal amount of the company’s share shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of the value of the property securing the business loan, unless the amount in excess of ninety percent (90%) is:

Loaned from available funds which are not proceeds received directly from the sale of the company’s bonds and are not restricted under the terms of the resolution authorizing, or the indenture securing, such bonds; or

Insured or guaranteed by a federal agency or by a private insurer qualified to write such insurance in the state, insuring a percentage of any claim for loss at least equal to that percentage of the value by which the business loan exceeds ninety percent (90%) thereof;

The value of the property securing the business loan is certified by the participating lender, on the basis of such appraisals, bids, purchase orders and engineers’ certificates as the company may require; provided that the value of items purchased and constructed from the proceeds of the business loan shall not be deemed, for purposes of this section, to exceed the contract price in respect of purchase or construction;

The company shall not disburse funds under a commitment to participate in a business loan for the construction or substantial improvement of property until the construction or improvement has been completed, unless a lender furnishes an irrevocable letter of credit or a qualified corporate surety furnishes payment and performance bonds, in either event satisfactory to the company and in an aggregate amount equal to the cost of such construction or improvement;

No other indebtedness may be secured by a mortgage on, or security interest in, property securing a business loan made or purchased pursuant to this section without the prior express written authorization of the company; and

The participating lender agrees to use the proceeds of the business loan to lend to eligible businesses in the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 6; Laws, 1987, ch. 464, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 4; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved June 30, 1990).

§ 57-10-213.
Issuance of bonds to finance projects of eligible businesses.

In addition to, and not as a limitation upon, the powers of the company to issue bonds as elsewhere conferred in this article, and upon the receipt of a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Economic and Community Development, the company also shall have the power to issue bonds, the proceeds of which, after payment of the costs of issuance thereof, will be used to make loans to finance or refinance the projects of eligible businesses. The company shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section and to provide procedures for the making of such loans and the repayment thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 7; Laws, 1987, ch. 464, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 52; Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 5; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved June 30, 1990).

§ 57-10-215.
Insurance or guaranty fund.

There is hereby created an insurance or guaranty fund of the company which may be used for any of the following purposes:

To insure the payment or repayment of all or any part of the principal of, redemption or prepayment premiums or penalties on, and interest on its bonds;

To insure the payment or repayment of all or any part of the principal of, redemption or prepayment premiums or penalties on, and interest on any instrument executed, obtained or delivered in connection with the issuance and sale of its bonds; and

To pay or insure the payment of any fees or premiums necessary to obtain insurance, guarantees or other instruments or enhancement of credit for or support from any person in connection with financing assistance provided by the company under this article including but not limited to working capital loans made by a lender.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-217.
Security for bonds or instruments.

The bonds or instruments with respect to which financial assistance is provided by the company shall be secured or unsecured in a manner approved by the company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-219.
Premiums and fees for financial assistance.

The company may, in its discretion, set the premiums and fees to be paid to it for providing financial assistance under this article. The premiums and fees and expenses set by the company shall be payable in the amounts, at the time and in the manner that the company, in its discretion, requires. The premiums and fees need not be uniform among transactions and may vary in amount among transactions and at different stages during the terms of the transactions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-221.
Applicability of debt limitation or restriction.

Bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this article shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any debt limitation or restriction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-223.
Procedure for public hearings and approval.

Whenever federal law requires public hearings and public approval as a prerequisite to obtaining federal tax exemption for the interest paid on industrial development bonds under Section 141 of the Revenue Code, unless otherwise specified by federal law or regulation, the public hearing for industrial development bonds of the company shall be conducted by the company and the procedure for the public hearing and public approvals shall be as follows:

For a public hearing by the company;

Notice of the hearing shall be published at least once in a newspaper published or having general circulation in the municipality in which the facility to be financed is to be located, or having general circulation in the state, of intention to provide financing for a named applicant. The applicant shall pay the cost of notification. The notice shall specify the time and place of hearing at which persons may appear and present their views. The hearing shall be held not less than fourteen (14) days after the notice shall appear in such newspaper. The hearing may be held at any place within the state determined by the company;

The notice shall contain (A) the name and address of the company; (B) the name and address of the principal place of business, if any, of the applicant seeking financing; (C) the maximum dollar amount of financing sought; and (D) the type of business and purpose and specific location of the facility to be financed.

For public approval, the Governor or State Treasurer is appointed by this article as the applicable elected representative within the meaning of Section 147(f) of the Revenue Code.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 12; Laws, 1992, ch. 548 § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 14, 1992).

§ 57-10-225.
Loans to lenders.

The company may make, and undertake commitments to make, loans to lenders under terms and conditions requiring the proceeds thereof to be used by such lenders to make loans to eligible businesses. Loan commitments or actual loans may be originated through and serviced by any such lender. As a condition to a lender’s participating in such loan, such lender shall agree to use the proceeds of such loan within a reasonable period of time to make loans or purchase loans to provide eligible businesses, or finance the projects of eligible businesses, in the state or, if such lender has made a commitment to make loans to provide eligible businesses on the basis of a commitment from the company to purchase such loans, such lender will make such loans within a reasonable period of time.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 13; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved June 30, 1990).

§ 57-10-227.
Investment in, purchase and assignment of loans made by lenders.

The company may invest in, purchase or make commitments to invest in or purchase, and take assignments or make commitments to take assignments, of loans made by lenders for the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, expansion or purchase of a project or projects for eligible business.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 14; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved June 30, 1990).

§ 57-10-229.
Promulgation of regulations relating to §§ 57-10-225 and 57-10-227.

Prior to carrying out the powers granted under Sections 57-10-225 and 57-10-227, the company shall promulgate rules and regulations governing its activities authorized thereunder, including but not limited to rules and regulations relating to the following:

Procedures for the submission of requests or invitations and proposals for making loans to lenders and the investment in, purchase, assignment and sale of loans;

The reinvestment by a lender of the proceeds, or an equivalent amount, from any loan to a lender in loans to provide financing for eligible business in the state;

Assurances that the eligible business to be financed will improve employment conditions or otherwise improve industrial development in the state;

Rates, fees, charges and other terms and conditions for originating or servicing loans in order to protect against realization of an excessive financial return or benefit by the originator or servicer;

The type and amount of collateral or security to be provided to assure repayment of loans to lenders made by the company;

The type of collateral, payment bonds, performance bonds or other security to be provided for any loans made by a lender for construction loans;

The nature and amount of fees to be charged by the company to provide for expenses and reserves of the company;

Standards and requirements for the allocation of available money among lenders and the determination of the maturities, terms, conditions and interest rates for loans made, purchased, sold, assigned or committed pursuant hereto;

Commitment requirements for financing by lenders involving money provided, directly or indirectly, by the company; or

Any other appropriate matters related to the duties or exercise of the company’s powers hereunder.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 15; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved June 30, 1990).

§ 57-10-231.
Payment of bonds; additional security.

Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the company in proceedings relating to a particular issue of bonds, every issue of its bonds shall be payable solely out of any revenues of the company. The bonds additionally may be secured by a pledge of any grant, contribution or guarantee from the federal government or any person or a pledge by the company of any revenues from any source.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-233.
Liability of state or subdivisions on bonds; personal liability of directors; statement required on face of bond.

No bonds issued by the company under this article shall constitute a debt, liability or general obligation of the state or any political subdivision thereof (other than the company), or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or any political subdivision thereof (other than the company), but shall be payable solely as provided by the company. No member or officer of the board of directors of the company nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance thereof. Each bond issued under this article shall contain on the face thereof a statement that neither the state, nor any other political subdivision thereof, shall be obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon or other costs incident thereto except from the revenue or money pledged by the company and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of, or the interest on, such bond.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-235.
Term, interest rate, denominations, etc. of bonds; use of proceeds; rules and regulations.

The bonds shall be authorized by a resolution of the company, shall bear such date or dates, and shall mature at such time or times as such resolution may provide, except that no bond shall mature more than thirty (30) years from the date of issue. Bonds which are not subject to taxation shall bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denominations, be in such form, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption, including redemption prior to maturity, as such resolution may provide. Except as expressly provided otherwise in this article, the provisions of other laws of the state relating to the issuance of revenue bonds shall not apply to bonds issued by the company. As to bonds issued hereunder and designated as taxable bonds by the company, any immunity to taxation by the United States Government of interest on such bonds or notes is hereby waived. Bonds of the company may be sold by the company at public or private sale, from time to time, and at such price or prices as the company shall determine.

The company shall make available from the proceeds of bonds issued the amount of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) to every certified development company created by a planning and development district in this state, which monies shall be used by such certified development companies to assist businesses within the planning and development districts in a manner consistent with the provisions of this chapter and with the provisions of the federal act.

The company shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the activities authorized herein, including but not limited to:

Procedures for the submission of requests or proposals by the certified development companies;

The reinvestment by the certified development companies of bond proceeds;

Assurance that the eligible business to be financed will improve employment or otherwise improve industrial development in the state;

Rates, fees, charges and other terms and conditions of loans between the certified development companies and the borrowers;

The type and amount of collateral or security to be provided to assure repayment of bond proceeds and interest;

Standards and requirements for the allocation of available money among the certified development companies; and

Any other appropriate matters related to the duties or exercise of the company’s power hereunder.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 18; Laws, 1987, ch. 464, § 4; Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 6; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 15; Laws, 1993, ch. 548, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1993).

§ 57-10-237.
Miscellaneous provisions of resolution authorizing issuance of bonds.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds may contain provisions as to:

Pledging all or any part of the revenues of the company to secure the payment of the bonds subject to the terms of the proceedings relating to other bonds of the company as may then exist;

Pledging all or any part of the assets of the company, including loans and obligations securing the same, to secure the payment of the bonds, subject to the terms of the proceedings relating to other bonds of the company as may then exist;

The use and disposition of the gross income from loans owned by the company and payment of the principal of loans owned by the company;

The setting aside of reserves or sinking funds and the regulations and disposition thereof;

Limitations on the purposes to which the proceeds from the sale of bonds may be applied and pledging the proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds;

Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding or other bonds;

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any of the proceedings under which the bonds are being issued may be amended or abrogated, the number or percentage of bondholders who or which must consent thereto, and the manner in which the consent may be given;

The vesting in a trustee or trustees of such property, rights, powers and duties in trust as the company may determine, and limiting or abrogating the right of bondholders to appoint a trustee or limiting the rights, powers and duties of the trustee;

Defining the act or omissions to act which shall constitute a default and the obligations or duties of the company to the holders of the bonds, and providing for the rights and remedies of the holders of the bonds in the event of default, which rights and remedies may include the general laws of the state and other provisions of this article; or

Any other matter, of like or different character, which in any way affects the security or protection of the holders of the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-239.
Effect of pledge; recording of resolution or other instruments.

Any pledge made by the company shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge was made. The revenues or properties so pledged and thereafter received by the company shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the company, irrespective of whether the parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-241.
Cancellation and redemption of bonds.

The company, subject to the provisions in proceedings relating to outstanding bonds as may then exist, may purchase bonds out of any funds available therefor, which shall thereupon be cancelled, at any reasonable price which, if the bonds are then redeemable, shall not exceed the redemption price (and premium, if any) then applicable plus accrued interest to the redemption date thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-243.
Trust indenture.

The bonds may be secured by an indenture by and between the company and a corporate trustee which may be any bank or other corporation having the power of a trust company or any trust company within or without this state. Such indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the company in relation to the exercise of its powers and the custody, safekeeping and application of all money. The company may provide by the indenture for the payment of the proceeds of the bonds and revenues to the trustee under the indenture or other depository, and for the method of disbursement thereof, with such safeguards and restrictions as the company may determine. If the bonds shall be secured by an indenture, the bondholders shall have no authority to appoint a separate trustee to represent them.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-245.
Signatures on bonds.

In the event that any of the members or officers of the board of directors of the company shall cease to be members or officers of the board prior to the delivery of any bonds signed by them, their signatures or facsimiles thereof shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such members or officers had remained in office until such delivery.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-247.
Establishment of funds and accounts.

The company may create and establish such funds and accounts as may be necessary or desirable for its purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-249.
Contracts with bondholders.

The company shall have the power to contract with the holders of any of its bonds as to the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any money of the company, and of any money held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds, and to carry out such contract. Money held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds or in any way to secure bonds and deposits of money may be secured in the same manner as money of the company, and all banks and trust companies are authorized to give security for the deposits.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-251.
Effect of future amendments to article.

Subsequent amendments to this article shall not limit the rights vested in the company with respect to any agreements made with, or remedies available to, the holders of bonds issued under this article prior to the enactment of the amendments until the bonds, together with all interest thereon, and all costs and expenses in connection with any proceeding by or on behalf of the holders, are fully met and discharged.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-253.
Expenses.

All expenses incurred by the company in carrying out the provisions of this article shall be payable solely from funds provided under this article, and nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the company to incur indebtedness or liability on behalf of or payable by the state or any other political subdivision thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1985.